Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1115
County officers; deputies; compensation.

When a county officer is compelled by the pressure of the business of the office to employ a deputy, the county commissioners may make a reasonable allowance to such a deputy.

R.S.1866, c. 15, § 6, p. 128;

R.S.1913, § 5742;

C.S.1922, § 5071;

C.S.1929, § 84-808;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 84-808;

Laws 1990, LB 821, § 2.